Utah statutes.
61-2f-206.   Registration of entity or branch office -- Certification of education providers and courses -- Specialized licenses.

(1) (a)  An entity may not engage in an activity described in Section 61-2f-201, unless it is registered with the division.

(b)  To register with the division under this Subsection (1), an entity shall submit to the division:

(i)  an application in a form required by the division;

(ii)  evidence of an affiliation with a principal broker;

(iii)  evidence that the entity is registered and in good standing with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code; and

(iv)  a registration fee established by the commission with the concurrence of the division under Section 63J-1-504.

(c)  The division may terminate an entity's registration if:

(i)  the entity's registration with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code has been expired for at least three years; and

(ii)  the entity's license with the division has been inactive for at least three years.

(2) (a)  A principal broker shall register with the division each of the principal broker's branch offices.

(b)  To register a branch office with the division under this Subsection (2), a principal broker shall submit to the division:

(i)  an application in a form required by the division; and

(ii)  a registration fee established by the commission with the concurrence of the division under Section 63J-1-504.

(3) (a)  In accordance with rules made by the commission, the division shall certify:

(i)  a real estate school;

(ii)  a course provider; or

(iii)  an instructor.

(b)  In accordance with rules made by the commission, and with the concurrence of the commission, the division shall certify a continuing education course that is required under this chapter.

(4) (a)  Except as provided by rule, a principal broker may not be responsible for more than one registered entity at the same time.

(b) (i)  In addition to issuing a principal broker license, associate broker license, or sales agent license authorizing the performance of an act set forth in Section 61-2f-201, the division may issue a specialized sales license or specialized property management license with the scope of practice limited to the specialty.

(ii)  An individual may hold a specialized license in addition to a license as a principal broker, associate broker, or a sales agent.

(iii)  The commission may adopt rules pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, for the administration of this Subsection (4), including:

(A)  prelicensing and postlicensing education requirements;

(B)  examination requirements;

(C)  affiliation with real estate brokerages or property management companies; and

(D)  other licensing procedures.



Amended by Chapter 292, 2013 General Session

